California statutes. Public Utilities Code
(d) A subscriber who provides express prior consent pursuant to subdivision (b) may revoke that consent at any time. A provider of mobile telephony services shall comply with the subscriber’s request to opt out within a reasonable period of time, not to exceed 60 days.

(e) A subscriber shall not be charged for making the choice to not have their name and mobile telephony dialing number be listed in a publicly available directory assistance database.

(f) This
 section does not apply to the provision of telephone numbers to the following parties for the purposes indicated:

(1) To a collection agency, to the extent disclosures made by the agency are supervised by the commission, exclusively for the collection of unpaid debts.

(2) (A) To any law enforcement agency, fire protection agency, public health agency, public environmental health agency, city or county emergency services planning agency, or private for-profit agency operating under contract with, and at the direction of, one or more of these agencies, for the sole purpose of responding to a 911 call, communicating an imminent threat to life or property, or testing the
 systems that respond to 911 calls or communicate threats to life or property.

(B) Any information or records provided to a private for-profit agency pursuant to this subdivision shall be held in confidence by that agency and by any individual employed by or associated with that agency. This information or these records shall not be open to examination for any purpose not directly connected with the administration of the services specified in subdivision (e) of Section 2872 or this paragraph.

(3) To a lawful process issued under state or federal law.

(4) To a telephone corporation providing service between service areas for the provision to the subscriber of telephone service between service areas, or to third parties for
 the limited purpose of providing billing services.

(5) To a telephone corporation to effectuate a customer’s request to transfer the customer’s assigned telephone number from the customer’s existing provider of telecommunications services to a new provider of telecommunications services.

(6) To the commission pursuant to its jurisdiction and control over telephone and telegraph corporations.

(g) Every deliberate violation of this section is grounds for a civil suit by the aggrieved subscriber against the organization or corporation and its employees responsible for the violation.

(h) For purposes of this section, “unpublished or unlisted access number” means a
 telephone, telex, teletex, facsimile, computer modem, or any other code number that is assigned to a subscriber by a telephone or telegraph corporation for the receipt of communications initiated by other telephone or telegraph customers and that the subscriber has requested that the telephone or telegraph corporation keep in confidence.

(i) No telephone corporation, nor any official or employee thereof, shall be subject to criminal or civil liability for the release of customer information as authorized by this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 449, Sec. 1.   (AB 1079)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

2891.2.

Telephone subscribers shall be annually notified that use of an “800” or “900” telephone number may result in the disclosure of the subscriber’s telephone number to the called party. The commission shall, by rule or order, impose the responsibility for the notification with the telephone corporation that offers the caller identification service, often known as automatic number identification, in connection with an “800” or “900” service.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 351, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

2892.1.

(a) For purposes of this section, “telecommunications service” means voice communication provided by a telephone corporation as defined in Section 234, voice communication provided by a provider of satellite telephone services, voice communication provided by a provider of mobile telephony service, as defined in Section 224.4, and voice communication provided by a commercially available facilities-based provider of voice communication services utilizing Voice over Internet Protocol or any successor protocol.

(b) The commission, in consultation with the Office of Emergency Services, shall open an investigative or other appropriate proceeding to identify the need for telecommunications service systems not on the customer’s premises to have backup electricity to
 enable telecommunications networks to function and to enable the customer to contact a public safety answering point operator during an electrical outage, to determine performance criteria for backup systems, and to determine whether the best practices recommended by the Network Reliability and Interoperability Council in December 2005, for backup systems have been implemented by telecommunications service providers operating in California. If the commission determines it is in the public interest, the commission shall, consistent with subdivisions (c) and (d), develop and implement performance reliability standards.

(c) The commission, in developing any standards pursuant to the proceeding required by subdivision (b), shall consider current best practices and technical feasibility for establishing battery backup requirements.

(d) The commission shall not implement standards
 pursuant to the proceeding required by subdivision (b) unless it determines that the benefits of the standards exceed the costs.

(e) The commission shall determine the feasibility of the use of zero greenhouse gas emission fuel cell systems to replace diesel backup power systems.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 370, Sec. 254.   (SB 1371)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

2892.3.

(a) The commission shall require providers of mobile telephony service, as defined in Section 224.4, to report to the commission, as specified by the commission, on activities associated with customer fraud.

(b) Each report shall include a description of the types of fraud occurring, the amount of revenues that have been uncollectible because of fraud, and the actions undertaken by the mobile telephony service provider to combat fraud.

(c) The commission shall require mobile telephony service providers to provide their subscribers with a notice, to be reviewed by the commission, warning subscribers about problems associated with fraud, and informing them about ways to protect against fraud.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 198, Sec. 21.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

2892.5.

(a) As used in this section “public safety agency” means a “public safety agency” as defined in Section 53102 of the Government Code.

(b) A provider of commercial mobile radio service, as defined in Section 216.8, may enter into a contract with a public safety agency to give the transmissions of public safety agency end users of that service priority over the transmissions of other persons or entities. The contract shall comply with applicable federal
 law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 198, Sec. 22.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

2893.

(a) The commission shall, by rule or order, require that every telephone call identification service offered in this state by a telephone corporation, or by any other person or corporation that makes use of the facilities of a telephone corporation, shall allow a caller to withhold display of the caller’s telephone number, on an individual basis, from the telephone instrument of the individual receiving the telephone call placed by the caller. However a caller shall not be allowed to withhold the display of the caller’s business telephone
 number when that number is being used for telemarketing purposes.

(b) There shall be no charge to the caller who requests that his or her telephone number be withheld from the recipient of any call placed by the caller.

(c) The commission shall direct every telephone corporation to notify its subscribers that their calls may be identified to a called party either:

(1) Thirty or more days before the telephone corporation commences to participate in the offering of a call identification service.

(2) By March 1, 1990, if the telephone corporation is participating in a call identification service prior to January 1, 1990.

(d) This section does not apply to any of the following:

(1) An identification service which is used within the same limited system, including, but not limited to, a Centrex or private branch exchange (PBX) system, as the recipient telephone.

(2) An identification service which is used on a public agency’s emergency telephone line or on the line which receives the primary emergency telephone number (911).

(3) Any identification service provided in connection with legally sanctioned call tracing or tapping procedures.

(4) Any identification service provided in connection with any “800” or “900” access code telephone service until the telephone corporation develops the technical capability to comply with subdivision (a), as determined by the commission. 

(e) Until the market for local telephone service is competitive, a telephone corporation shall not charge any subscriber for having an unlisted or unpublished telephone number. However, nothing in this subdivision shall be interpreted by the commission to reduce the revenues of telephone corporations. Any actions of the commission pursuant to this subdivision shall be implemented on a competitively neutral basis. This charge shall not be eliminated prior to the effective date upon which offsetting rates are implemented by the commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 675, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

2893.2.

(a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) “Call” means the initiation of telecommunications service by accessing a number issued pursuant to the North American Numbering Plan, irrespective of whether the call is initiated using a traditional landline over the public switched telephone network, using mobile telephony service, or using interconnected VoIP service network.

(2) “Caller” means a person or entity that places a call.

(3) “Caller identification information,” “caller identification service,”
 “information regarding the origination,” and “interconnected VoIP Service” have the same meanings as defined in Section 64.1600 of Title 47 of the Code of Federal Regulations as of January 1, 2019.

(4) “Enter” means to input data by whatever means into a computer or telephone system.

(5) “False government information” means caller identification information that misrepresents the identity of the caller to the recipient of a call, or to the network itself, by presenting information regarding the origination of the call as being from the federal government, state government, a local government, or any agent thereof.

(6) “Federal government” means the United States, or any agency or instrumentality of the United States.

(7) “Local government” means any city, city and county, county, public district, public corporation, authority, agency, board, commission, or other public entity in the state.

(8) “Phone number” means an access number issued pursuant to the North American Numbering Plan.

(9) “Telecommunications” and “telecommunications service” have the same meanings as defined in Section 153 of Title 47 of the United States Code as of January 1, 2019.

(b) (1) A caller shall not enter, or cause to be entered, false government information into a caller identification system with the intent to mislead, cause harm, deceive, or defraud the recipient of the call.

(2) A person or entity may not make a call knowing that false government information was entered into the caller identification system with the intent to mislead, cause harm, deceive, or defraud the recipient of the call.

(c) This section does not apply to any of the following:

(1) The blocking of caller identification information.

(2) Any law enforcement agency of the federal government or a state or local government.

(3) Any intelligence or security agency of the federal
 government.

(4) A telecommunications, broadband, or interconnected VoIP service provider that is acting solely as an intermediary for the transmission of telecommunications service between the caller and the recipient.

(d) Any person or entity that violates this section may be enjoined in any court of competent jurisdiction.

(e) (1) Any person or entity that knowingly violates this section shall be subject to a civil penalty of up to ten thousand dollars ($10,000) for each violation.

(2) An action to enforce this section may be brought by a city attorney, district attorney, or the Attorney General.

(3) If during the investigation of a complaint for possible violation of Article 1 (commencing with Section 2871), the commission determines that a violation of this section may have occurred, the commission shall notify both the district attorney of the county where the call was received and the Attorney General of the potential violation.

(4) This section shall apply in addition to any other applicable law prohibiting the same or similar activity.

(f) The provisions of this section are severable. If any provision of this section or its application is held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications that can be given effect without the
 invalid provision or application.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 452, Sec. 2.   (AB 1132)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

2893.5.

(a) This section shall be known, and may be cited, as the Consumer Call Protection Act of 2019.

(b) On or before January 1, 2021, each telecommunications service provider shall implement Secure Telephony Identity Revisited (STIR) and Secure Handling of Asserted information using toKENs (SHAKEN) protocols or alternative technology that provides comparable or superior capability to verify and authenticate caller identification for calls carried over an internet protocol network.

(c) (1) Pursuant to the authority granted to states in Section 227 of Title 47 of the United States Code, the commission and the Attorney General may take all appropriate actions to
 enforce that section and any regulation promulgated under that section.

(2) The commission may, at the request of the Attorney General, work with the Attorney General for the purposes of the enforcement of subdivisions (e) and (g) of Section 227 of Title 47 of the United States Code.

(d) A good faith effort to comply with the requirements of subdivision (b) shall be a defense to a claim for violating this section brought pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 17200) of Part 2 of Division 7 of the Business and Professions Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 471, Sec. 2.   (SB 208)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

2894.

(a) Notwithstanding subdivision (e) of Section 2891, the disclosure of any information by an interexchange telephone corporation, a local exchange telephone corporation, or a provider of commercial mobile radio service, as defined in Section 216.8, in good faith compliance with the terms of a state or federal court warrant or order or administrative subpoena issued at the request of a law enforcement official or other federal, state, or local governmental agency for law enforcement purposes, is a complete defense against any civil action
 brought under this chapter or any other law, including, but not limited to, Chapter 1.5 (commencing with Section 630) of Part 1 of Title 15 of the Penal Code, for the wrongful disclosure of that information.

(b) As used in this section the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) “Interexchange telephone corporation” means a telephone corporation that is a long-distance carrier.

(2) “Local exchange telephone corporation” means a telephone corporation that provides local exchange services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 198, Sec. 23.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

2894.10.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares that a number of federal and state laws have been enacted to protect residential telephone subscribers’ privacy rights with respect to telephone solicitations. Various governmental agencies publish information that generally describes telephone subscribers’ rights under these laws. Examples of publications include the Federal Trade Commission’s brochure, “Straight Talk About Telemarketing,” and the Federal Communications Commission’s publication, “Consumer News, What You Can Do About Unsolicited
 Telephone Marketing Calls and Faxes.” The Legislature intends that telephone subscribers be provided with information regarding their privacy rights, under state and federal law, with respect to telephone solicitations.

(b) Every local exchange telephone corporation shall provide its residential customers with information regarding state and federal laws that protect the privacy rights of residential telephone subscribers with respect to telephone solicitations by providing on an annual basis one or more of the following items of information in the billing statement of each residential customer and in conspicuous notices in the consumer information pages of the local telephone directories distributed by that telephone corporation:

(1) A copy of a publication prepared by the Department of Consumer Affairs, the Public Utilities Commission, the Federal Trade Commission, or any other
 federal or state governmental agency that generally describes telephone subscribers’ privacy rights, under state and federal laws, with respect to telephone solicitations.

(2) A list of the titles of the publications identified in paragraph (1) and information on how to obtain those publications.

(c) A provider of local exchange service shall not be subject to any penalties if the provider makes a good faith effort to provide or identify the publications described in subdivision (b).

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 473, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Telecommunication Services [2895. - 2899.]

2895.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the Telecommunications Customer Service Act of 1993.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1233, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

2896.

The commission shall require telephone corporations to provide customer service to telecommunication customers that includes, but is not limited to, all the following:

(a) Sufficient information upon which to make informed choices among telecommunications services and providers. This includes, but is not limited to, information regarding the provider’s identity, service options, pricing, and terms and conditions of service. A provider need only provide information to its customers on the services
 which it offers.

(b) Ability to access a live operator by dialing the numeral “0” as an available, free option. The commission may authorize rates and charges for any operator assistance service provided subsequent to access.

(c) Reasonable statewide service quality standards, including, but not limited to, standards regarding network technical quality, customer service, installation, repair, and billing.

(d) Information concerning the regulatory process and how customers can participate in that process, including the process of resolving complaints.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1233, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

2896.1.

A provider of commercial mobile radio service, as defined in Section 216.8, shall provide access for end users of that service to the local emergency telephone systems described in the Warren-911-Emergency Assistance Act (Article 6 (commencing with Section 53100) of Chapter 1 of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code). “911” shall be the primary access number for those emergency systems. A provider of commercial mobile radio service, in accordance with all applicable Federal Communication Commission orders, shall transmit all “911” calls from technologically compatible commercial mobile radio service communication devices without requiring user validation or any similar procedure. A provider of commercial mobile radio service may not charge any airtime, access, or similar usage charge for any “911” call placed
 from a commercial mobile radio service telecommunications device to a local emergency telephone system.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 241, Sec. 3.   (AB 1564)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

2897.

Consistent with other provisions of this code, orders, rules, and applicable tariffs of telecommunications service providers, the commission shall apply these policies to all providers of telecommunications services in California. These policies are not exclusive and may be supplemented by the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1233, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

2898.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this part, upon receiving a request pursuant to subdivision (b), the mobile internet service provider shall not impair or degrade the lawful internet traffic of a first response agency’s identified account until the earlier of either the time when the account is no longer being used by the agency in response to the emergency or the end of the emergency, subject to reasonable network management.

(b) (1) A first response agency may submit a request to a mobile internet service provider to not impair or degrade the lawful internet traffic of an account used by the agency in response to an emergency. As part of the request, the first response agency shall identify the account number and lines for the mobile
 internet service provider.

(2) A first response agency that submits a request pursuant to paragraph (1) shall notify the mobile internet service provider upon the account no longer being used by the agency in response to the emergency.

(c) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Emergency” means the existence of conditions of disaster or of extreme peril to the safety of persons and property within the state, or the territorial limits of a county, city and county, or city, caused by a fire, flood, storm, riot, cyberterrorism, sudden and severe energy shortage, Governor’s warning of an earthquake or volcanic prediction, earthquake, or other similar condition.

(2) “First response agencies” has the same meaning as defined in
 Section 8592.1 of the Government Code, and shall include fire districts.

(3) “Mobile internet service provider” has the same meaning as defined in Section 3100 of the Civil Code.

(4) “Reasonable network management” has the same meaning as defined in Section 3100 of the Civil Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 370, Sec. 255.   (SB 1371)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

2899.

(a) For purposes of this section, “incarcerated persons calling services” means communication services rendered to incarcerated persons, including, but not limited to, voice communications.

(b) The commission shall establish service quality standards for incarcerated persons calling services to be adhered to by communication service providers rendering services to state or local correctional or detention facilities.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 827, Sec. 3.   (SB 1008)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 3. SURRENDER OF MUNICIPAL CONTROL [2901. - 2976.]



  CHAPTER 1. Surrender of Control by Municipal Corporations [2901. - 2976.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions and Definitions [2901. - 2907.]

2901.

Any municipal corporation may retain or surrender to the commission the powers of control vested in it to supervise and regulate the relationship between any one or more classes of public utilities, and their present or prospective customers, consumers, or patrons, and, if it has retained such powers over any class of public utilities, may thereafter surrender such powers to the commission.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

2902.

This chapter shall not be construed to authorize any municipal corporation to surrender to the commission its powers of control to supervise and regulate the relationship between a public utility and the general public in matters affecting the health, convenience, and safety of the general public, including matters such as the use and repair of public streets by any public utility, the location of the poles, wires, mains, or conduits of any public utility, on, under, or above any public streets, and the speed of common carriers operating within the limits of the municipal corporation.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

2903.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions and general provisions set forth in this article govern the construction of this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

2904.

“Municipal corporation” means a city and county or incorporated city.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

2905.

“Legislative body” means the board of supervisors, municipal council, commission, or other legislative or governing body of a municipal corporation.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

2906.

“Powers of control” means all powers of control vested in a municipal corporation to supervise and regulate (a) the relationship between public utilities and their present or prospective customers, consumers, or patrons. The term does not include the powers of control vested in any municipal corporation to supervise and regulate the relationship between such public utilities and the general public in matters affecting the health, convenience, and safety of the general public, including matters such as the use and repair of public streets by any public utility, the location of the poles, wires, mains, or conduits of any public utility, on, under, or above any public streets, and (b) the speed of common carriers operating within the limits of the municipal corporation.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

2907.

“Railroad corporation,” “street railroad corporation,” “common carrier,” “gas corporation,” “electrical corporation,” “telephone corporation,” “telegraph corporation,” “water corporation,” and “public utility” have the same meaning as is given to them, respectively, in Part 1 (commencing with Section 201).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 369, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Petition for Election [2931. - 2939.]

2931.

The question whether any municipal corporation shall retain its powers of control respecting one or more classes of public utilities may be submitted to the qualified electors of the municipal corporation, as provided in this chapter, either at a general municipal election or at a special election.

The question may be submitted, either (a) in pursuance of an ordinance of intention adopted by a vote of three-fifths of all the members of the legislative body of the municipal corporation, declaring that the public interest requires the submission of, and that it is the intention of the legislative body to submit the question to a vote of the qualified electors of the municipal corporation or (b) in pursuance of a petition of qualified electors of the municipal corporation.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

2932.

The ordinance of intention or the petition, as the case may be, shall contain the propositions proposed to be so submitted, as set forth in Section 2965.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

2933.

The petition shall be signed by qualified electors of the municipal corporation, equal in number to 10 per centum of the qualified electors, computed upon the total number of votes cast in the municipal corporation for all candidates for Governor at the last preceding general election prior to the filing of the petition at which a governor was elected. The petition may consist of separate papers, but if any paper consists of more than one sheet it shall be securely fastened together at the top. The signatures need not all be appended to one sheet of paper. Each paper shall have attached, at the bottom of the last sheet, the affidavit of a qualified elector of the municipal corporation, stating that all of the signatures on each sheet were made in his presence, and that to the best of his knowledge and belief each signature is a genuine signature of the person whose name purports to be subscribed.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

2934.

The petition shall be filed with the clerk of the legislative body of the municipal corporation. Within 10 days from the date of the filing of the petition, the clerk shall examine the petition and ascertain from the record of the registration of the electors of the city and county, or of the county in which the municipal corporation is situated, whether the petition is signed by the requisite number of qualified electors. Upon request of the clerk, the legislative body of the municipal corporation shall authorize him to employ persons specially to assist him in the work of examining the petition and shall provide for their compensation.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

2935.

Upon completion of the examination, the clerk shall forthwith attach to the petition his certificate, properly dated, showing the result of the examination. If from the examination, the clerk finds that the petition is signed by the requisite number of qualified electors, he shall certify that the petition is sufficient. If, from the examination, he finds that the petition is not signed by the requisite number of qualified electors, he shall certify to the number of qualified electors signing the petition and to the number of qualified electors required to make the petition sufficient.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

2936.

If, by the certificate of the clerk, the petition is shown to be insufficient, it may be amended by filing a supplemental petition within 10 days from the date of the certificate.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

2937.

The clerk shall, within 10 days from the filing of the supplemental petition, make a like examination of the supplemental petition and certify to the result of the examination as provided in Section 2936. If the certificate of the clerk shows any petition, or any petition together with a supplemental petition, to be insufficient, it shall be retained by him and kept as a public record, without prejudice, however, to the filing of a new petition to the same effect. But if, by the certificate of the clerk, any petition, or any petition together with a supplemental petition, is shown to be sufficient, the clerk shall forthwith present the petition to the legislative body of the municipal corporation.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

2938.

The sufficiency or insufficiency of the petition shall not be subject to review by the legislative body. After the election held in pursuance of the petition, the sufficiency of the petition in any respect shall not be subject to judicial review or be otherwise questioned.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

2939.

In any city and county having a board of election commissioners and a registrar of voters, the clerk of the legislative body thereof shall immediately upon the filing of any petition with him, transmit the petition to the board of election commissioners, who shall forthwith deliver the petition to the registrar of voters, who shall perform all the duties herein required to be performed in other municipal corporations by the clerk of the legislative body respecting the examination and certification of the petition. The registrar of voters shall, upon making his certificate, forthwith return the petition to the clerk, who shall thereupon present the petition and the attached certificate to the legislative body of the municipal corporation as provided in this article.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Elections [2961. - 2976.]

2961.

Upon the adoption of an ordinance of intention, or the presentation of a petition, as provided in Article 2 (commencing with Section 2931), the legislative body of the municipal corporation shall, by ordinance, order the holding of a special election for the purpose of submitting to the qualified electors of the municipal corporation the propositions set forth in the ordinance of intention or in the petition, as the case may be, or the legislative body shall, by ordinance, order the submission of the propositions at a general municipal election.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 101, Sec. 151.)
-------------------------------------------

2962.

A special election shall be held on the next established election date not less than 74 days after the adoption of the ordinance of intention, or the presentation of the petition to the legislative body.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1973, Ch. 1146.)
-------------------------------------------

2963.

Every special election held in any municipal corporation under the provisions of this chapter, shall be called by the legislative body thereof, by ordinance, which shall specify the propositions to be submitted at the election and the date thereof, and, where provision is not otherwise made by law, shall establish the election precincts and designate the polling places, and the names of the election officers for each precinct.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

2964.

The ordinance shall, prior to the election, be published five times in a daily newspaper printed and published in the municipal corporation, or twice in a weekly newspaper printed and published therein, if there is no such daily newspaper. If no daily or weekly newspaper is printed and published in the municipal corporation, the clerk of the legislative body shall post a copy of the ordinance in three public places in the municipal corporation at least 10 days prior to the election.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

2965.

The ballots to be used at any general municipal election or at any special election, at which is submitted the question whether a municipal corporation shall retain its powers of control respecting public utilities shall have printed thereon, in addition to the other matters required by law, those of the following propositions as are specified in the ordinance of intention or the petition:
“PropositionNo.1.Shall______ (name of municipal corporation) retain its powers of control over railroad corporations?”

“PropositionNo.2.Shall______ (name of municipal corporation) retain its powers of control over street railroad corporations?”

“PropositionNo.3.Shall______ (name of municipal corporation) retain its powers of control over common carriers other than railroad and street railroad corporations?”

“PropositionNo.4.Shall______ (name of municipal corporation) retain its powers of control over gas corporations?”

“PropositionNo.5.Shall______ (name of municipal corporation) retain
 its powers of control over electrical corporations?”

“PropositionNo.6.Shall______ (name of municipal corporation) retain its powers of control over telephone corporations?”

“PropositionNo.7.Shall______ (name of municipal corporation) retain its powers of control over telegraph corporations?”

“PropositionNo.8.Shall______ (name of municipal corporation) retain its powers of control over water corporations?”

“PropositionNo.9.Shall______ (name of municipal corporation) retain its powers of control over wharfingers?”

“PropositionNo.10.Shall______ (name of municipal corporation) retain its powers of control over warehousemen?”
To the right of or below each proposition to be voted upon, the words “Yes” and “No” shall be printed on separate lines, with voting targets. If a voter marks the voting target next to the printed word “Yes,” the voter’s vote shall be counted in favor of the retention of the powers of control of the municipal corporation. If the voter marks the voting target next to the printed word “No,” the voter’s vote shall be counted against the
 retention of those powers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 303, Sec. 27.   (AB 1512)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

2966.

If the propositions specified in Section 2965 are submitted at a special election in any municipal corporation, the legislative body or other body or board charged with the duty of canvassing the returns and declaring the result of elections in the municipal corporation, shall meet at their usual place of meeting on the first Monday after the election to canvass the returns and to declare the result thereof.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

2967.

Immediately upon the completion of the canvass of the returns of any special or general municipal election at which the propositions specified in Section 2965 were submitted, the legislative body or other body or board charged with the duty shall make an order declaring the result of the election upon such propositions and shall cause the results to be entered upon its minutes. The order shall show the total number of votes cast upon each proposition, and the number of votes cast respectively in favor of and against each proposition.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

2968.

If it appears from the result of the election, as so declared, that a majority of the qualified electors of the municipal corporation have voted to retain the powers of control of the municipal corporation respecting any particular class of public utility, the municipal corporation is deemed to have elected to retain the powers of control respecting such class of public utility, and such powers shall be exercised by the municipal corporation until they are surrendered.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

2969.

If it appears from the result of the election, as so declared, that a majority of the qualified electors voted not to retain the powers of control respecting any class of public utility, the municipal corporation is deemed to have elected not to retain the powers of control, and the powers of control shall thereafter vest in and be exercised by the commission.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

2970.
